District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-923

Eligibility and admission to membership.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 485, ch. 397, § 23
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-217, § 2(a), 46 DCR 284
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-923.
1981 Ed., § 29-1123.
1973 Ed., § 29-823.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Cooperative Association Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-265, April 25, 1997, law notification 43 DCR 4355).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Cooperative Association Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-483, January 13, 1997, 44 DCR 626), and see § 2(a) of the Cooperative Association Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-59, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2235).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Cooperative Association Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-203, December 2, 1997, 44 DCR 7498).